Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2137.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 2701 and 2928 of Title 34 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended by adding subsections to read:§ 2701. License requirements.* * *(d) Exemption for members of the armed services and disabled veterans.--(1) The commission shall issue a Military Event License Exemption exempting eligible individuals under paragraph (2) from the license and permit fee requirements under section 2709 (relating to license costs and fees) while participating in an eligible activity for which the commission has issued a 12345678910111213141516171819 Military Event License Exemption Permit under paragraph (3).(2) The following individuals are eligible for a Military Event License Exemption under paragraph (1):(i) A veteran of the armed forces of the United States who has been certified by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs or its predecessor or by any branch of the United States Armed Forces to have served during war time and has a service-connected disability of 30% or more.(ii) An active duty member, reserve duty member or veteran of any branch of the United States Armed Forces who has received the Purple Heart.(iii) One additional individual per eligible individual under subparagraph (i) or (ii), who shall provide assistance to the eligible individual as necessary during the specified permitted event.(3) The commission may issue a Military Event License Exemption Permit for an event, subject to paragraph (5), whose primary purpose is the rehabilitation or enjoyment of eligible individuals. Each eligible individual must receive a Military Event License Exemption to participate in the event. The event may have a duration of no more than seven consecutive days.(4) All regulations and requirements regarding seasons, bag limits and reporting standards must be adhered to by the participants of an event under paragraph (3).(5) An individual or entity that wishes to host an event for which the commission may issue a Military Event License Exemption Permit under paragraph (3) shall apply for the Military Event License Exemption Permit in a manner provided 20260HB2137PN2762 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 by the commission no less than 14 days prior to the event. The following apply:(i) The permit applicant shall provide the commission with the documentation required for each eligible individual participating in the event.(ii) The permit application shall include the ability to apply for a Military Event License Exemption for each eligible individual participating in the event for which the applicant is applying for a Military Event License Exemption Permit.(iii) The fee to apply for a Military Event License Exemption Permit shall be the product of multiplying the license cost under section 2709(a)(2)(ii) by the number of eligible individuals participating in the event.(6) Military Event License Exemption Permits may only be used for an event hosted on private land within this Commonwealth with the express approval of the landowner.(7) The commission may issue a Military Event License Exemption Permit for an event with no more than 10 eligible individuals participating.(8) The commission may not issue a Military Event License Exemption Permit for an event that would unduly impact commission resources or impose significant costs to the commission.(9) The commission shall impose upon each Military Event License Exemption Permit reasonable conditions that are necessary to assure that the use or activity authorized under the permit will limit liability to the commission.(10) Violations of the terms of the Military Event License Exemption Permit or violation of any other game law 20260HB2137PN2762 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 under this title shall result in the revocation of the permit and possible denial of future Military Event License Exemption Permit applications.(11) The commission shall promulgate guidelines for the implementation and issuance of Military Event License Exemptions and Military Event License Exemption Permits under this subchapter.(12) The following words and phrases when used in this subsection shall have the meanings given to them in this paragraph unless context clearly indicates otherwise:"Eligible individual." An individual eligible for a Military Event License Exemption under paragraph (2)."Military Event License Exemption." The Military Event License Exemption issued under paragraph (1)."Military Event License Exemption Permit." The Military Event License Exemption Permit issued under paragraph (3).§ 2928. Regulated hunting grounds permits.* * *(f.1) Exception.--Notwithstanding subsection (f), a permittee may remove or have removed from its premises any bird that is permitted to be killed under the authority of this permit without adhering to the tagging requirement of subsection (f) as long as the permittee attaches to the package or container that contains the killed birds a label that states the permittee's name, address, permit number, number and types of killed birds and the date the birds were killed. The label under this subsection shall remain on the package or container that contains the killed birds under the authority of this permit and removed from the permittee's premises until the birds are either returned to the permittee's address identified on the label or 20260HB2137PN2762 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the birds are prepared for consumption.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2137PN2762 - 5 - 123